Missouri, session 2026, SB1176.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 571.070 and 571.080, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 571.023, 571.070, and 571.080, to read as
follows:
571.023. 1. As used in this section the following
terms mean:
(1) "Assault weapon", any:
(a) Semiautomatic rifle that has the capacity to
accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the
following:
a. A pistol grip or thumbhole stock;
b. Any feature capable of functioning as a protruding
grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand;
c. A folding or telescoping stock; or
d. A shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially
or completely encircles the barrel, that allows the bearer
to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being
burned, excluding a slide that encloses the barrel;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1176 2
(b) Semiautomatic pistol or semiautomatic rifle with a
fixed magazine that has the capacity to accept more than ten
rounds of ammunition;
(c) Semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to
accept a detachable magazine and has:
a. Any feature capable of functioning as a protruding
grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand;
b. A folding, telescoping, or thumbhole stock;
c. A shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially
or completely encircles the barrel, that allows the bearer
to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being
burned, excluding a slide that encloses the barrel; or
d. The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at any
location other than the pistol grip;
(d) Semiautomatic shotgun that has:
a. A pistol grip or thumbhole stock;
b. Any feature capable of functioning as a protruding
grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand;
c. A folding or telescoping stock;
d. A fixed magazine capacity in excess of five rounds;
or
e. An ability to accept a detachable magazine;
(e) Shotgun with a revolving cylinder; or
(f) Conversion kit, part, or combination of parts from
which an assault weapon can be assembled if in the
possession or under the control of a single person.
"Assault weapon" shall not include any firearm made
permanently inoperable;
(2) "Detachable magazine", either:

SB 1176 3
(a) An ammunition feeding device that can be loaded or
unloaded while detached from a firearm and can be readily
inserted into a firearm; or
(b) A magazine that can be detached from a firearm by
pressing a button on the firearm either with a finger, tool,
or bullet;
(3) "Fixed magazine", an ammunition feeding device
contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such
a manner that the device cannot be removed without
disassembly of the firearm action;
(4) "Large capacity magazine", any ammunition feeding
device with the capacity to accept more than ten rounds, but
excluding:
(a) A feeding device that has been permanently altered
so that it cannot accommodate more than ten rounds;
(b) A twenty-two caliber tubular magazine; or
(c) A tubular magazine contained in a lever-action
firearm.
2. No person, corporation, or other entity in the
state of Missouri shall manufacture, import, possess,
purchase, sell, or transfer any assault weapon or large
capacity magazine.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Any government officer, agent, or employee; member
of the United States Armed Forces; or peace officer, to the
extent that the person is authorized to acquire or possess
an assault weapon or large capacity magazine and does so
while acting within the scope of his or her duties;
(2) The manufacture of an assault weapon or large
capacity magazine by a firearms manufacturer for the purpose
of sale to an entity or person described under subdivision

SB 1176 4
(1) of this subsection, provided that the manufacturer is
properly licensed under federal and state laws;
(3) The sale or transfer of an assault weapon or large
capacity ammunition feeding device by a dealer, who is
properly licensed under federal, state, and local laws, to
an entity or person described under subdivision (1) of this
subsection for use by that entity or person for official
purposes; or
(4) Any person who, prior to and continuously since
the effective date of this section, was legally in
possession of an assault weapon or large capacity magazine.
4. A violation of this section is a class C felony.
571.070. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
possession of a firearm if such person knowingly has any
firearm in his or her possession and:
(1) Such person has been convicted of a felony under
the laws of this state, or of a crime under the laws of any
state or of the United States which, if committed within
this state, would be a felony; or
(2) Such person is a fugitive from justice, is
habitually in an intoxicated or drugged condition, or is
currently adjudged mentally incompetent or has been
committed to any state mental institution at sixteen years
of age or older.
2. Unlawful possession of a firearm is a class C
felony, unless a person has been convicted of a dangerous
felony as defined in section 556.061, or the person has a
prior conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm in
which case it is a class B felony.
3. The provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 1
of this section shall not apply to the possession of an
antique firearm.

SB 1176 5
571.080. A person commits the [crime] offense of
transfer of a concealable firearm if such person violates 18
U.S.C. Section 922(b), 18 U.S.C. Section 922(t), or 18
U.S.C. Section 922(x).
✓